Alaska, session 34, HB297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 16.05.251(d) is amended to read: 06 (d) Regulations adopted under (a) of this section must, consistent with 07 sustained yield and the provisions of AS 16.05.258, provide that [A FAIR AND 08 REASONABLE OPPORTUNITY FOR] the taking of fishery resources by residents 09 for personal and family consumption has preference over other uses [USE, 10 SPORT, AND COMMERCIAL FISHERMEN]. 11 * Sec. 2. AS 16.05.251(e) is amended to read: 12 (e) The Board of Fisheries may, subject to the preference set out in (d) of 13 this section, allocate fishery resources among personal use, sport, guided sport, and 14 commercial fisheries. The board shall adopt criteria for the allocation of fishery 01 resources and shall use the criteria as appropriate to particular allocation decisions. 02 The criteria may include factors such as 03 (1) the history of each personal use, sport, guided sport, and 04 commercial fishery; 05 (2) the number of residents and nonresidents who have participated in 06 each fishery in the past and the number of residents and nonresidents who can 07 reasonably be expected to participate in the future; 08 (3) the importance of each fishery for providing residents the 09 opportunity to obtain fish for personal and family consumption; 10 (4) the availability of alternative fisheries resources; 11 (5) the importance of each fishery to the economy of the state; 12 (6) the importance of each fishery to the economy of the region and 13 local area in which the fishery is located; 14 (7) the importance of each fishery in providing recreational 15 opportunities for residents and nonresidents; and 16 (8) whether personal use, sport, guided sport, and commercial 17 fishermen are provided a fair and reasonable opportunity to take the resource. 18 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.